Utah statutes.
48-3a-706.   Other claims against dissolved limited liability company.

(1)  A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the limited liability company to present them in accordance with the notice.

(2)  A notice under Subsection (1) must:

(a)  be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the dissolved limited liability company's principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the office of the limited liability company's registered agent is or was last located and in accordance with Section 45-1-101;

(b)  describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent; and

(c)  state that a claim against the limited liability company is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than three years after publication of the notice.

(3)  If a dissolved limited liability company publishes a notice in accordance with Subsection (2), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the limited liability company not later than three years after the publication date of the notice:

(a)  a claimant that did not receive notice in a record under Section 48-3a-705;

(b)  a claimant whose claim was timely sent to the limited liability company but not acted on; and

(c)  a claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the effective date of dissolution.

(4)  A claim not barred under this section or Section 48-3a-705 may be enforced:

(a)  against a dissolved limited liability company, to the extent of its undistributed assets; and

(b)  except as otherwise provided in Section 48-3a-707, if assets of the limited liability company have been distributed after dissolution, against a member or transferee to the extent of that person's proportionate share of the claim or of the limited liability company's assets distributed to the member or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person's total liability for all claims under this subsection may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

